src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON SUBJ_VTI_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiiniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiinnainiki  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiinoainiki ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>i'ki 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi			ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi			ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiinnainiki  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mmiinoainiki ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>i'ki 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi			ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>isi			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON UNREAL_VTI_SUFFIXES
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.KI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopiyini   ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.KI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopiyini   ENCLITICS ;	
! Plural UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaanopi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>'pohtopi 	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.KI@%>mahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;   
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopiyini    ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaanopi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>'pohtopi 	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.KI@%>mahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;   
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mahtopiyini    ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON IMP_VTI_SUFFIXES
! Singular IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.IMP@%>ta	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.IMP@%>tsi	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.IMP@%>ka	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.IMP@%>ki	ENCLITICS ;

! BELOW ARE THE VTA VERBS

LEXICON VTA_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@	INDEP_VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@	CONJ_VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@	SUBJ_VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@	IMP_VTA_SUFFIXES ;

! I will first list the DIRECT paradigms

LEXICON INDEP_VTA_SUFFIXES
! Interrogatives DIRECT Singular Object
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>aawaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>aawaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+4SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>ayiniwaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+4SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>ayiniwaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+4SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiwaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>annáánawaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>awááwaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>ááwa # ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+4SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>annáániwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+4SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>awááyiniwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+21Pl+4SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>ááwa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+4SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa # ;
! Interrogatives DIRECT Plural Object
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>waiksaawa # ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>waiksaawa # ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+4PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>waiksaawa # ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+4PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>waiksaawa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+4PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+4PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa # ;
@R.person.KI@+1Pl+2PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>ohpinnáánawa # ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>annáániwa # ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+4PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>annáániwa # ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>awááyiwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+4PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>awááyiwa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>ááyiwa # ;
! Interrogatives INVERSE Singular Object
@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+2SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+2SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokaatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NI@+3Pl+1SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;
@R.person.KI@+3Pl+2SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;
@R.person.NI@+4Pl+1SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;
@R.person.KI@+4Pl+2SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;
! Interrogatives INVERSE Plural Object
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+1PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokihpinnaana # ;
@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnáánawa # ;
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+2PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoááwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+21PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokááwa # ;
@R.person.NI@+4Sg+1PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnáániniwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+4Sg+2PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoááyiniwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+4Sg+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokawááyiniwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+4Sg+21PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokiyiniwa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;
@R.person.NI@+3Pl+1PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnáániwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+3Pl+2PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoááyiwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+3Pl+21PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokiyiwa # ;
@R.person.NI@+4Pl+1PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnáániwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+4Pl+2PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoááyiwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+4Pl+3PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoááyiwa # ;
@R.person.KI@+4Pl+21PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokiyiwa # ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+3SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokaiksaawa # ;

! Direct, Singular Subject and Object, INDEPENDENT
@R.person.KI@+1Sg+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVo   		ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+3SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVawa   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+4SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVayini   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+3SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVawa   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+4SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVayini		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+4PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVayi		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiwa   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+5Sg/PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiyini   	ENCLITICS ;

! Direct, Plural Subject, Singular Object, INDEPENDENT
@R.person.KI@+1Pl+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVohpinnaana  		ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVannaana   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+4SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVannaanini   		ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+3SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVawaawa   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+4SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVawaayini		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVawa   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVayini   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiyi   	ENCLITICS ;

! Direct, Plural Subject and Object, INDEPENDENT
@R.person.KI@+1Pl+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVohpinnaana  		ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVannaani  ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+4PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVannaani  ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+3PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVawaayi	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+4PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVawaayi	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVayi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVayi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiyi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+5Sg/PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiyi   	ENCLITICS ;

! Direct, Plural Object, Singular Subject
@R.person.KI@+1Sg+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVohpoaawa  		ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+3PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVayi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+4PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^VLVayi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+3PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^VLVayi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiwa   	ENCLITICS ;
!@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+5Sg/PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiyini   	ENCLITICS ; ! repeat line

! Inverse, Singular Subject and Object, INDEPENDENT
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+1SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVoki   		ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVoka   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVoka  		ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.OT@+4Sg+3SgO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVoka   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+4Sg+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokini   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+4Sg+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokini   	ENCLITICS ;
!@R.person.OT@+4Sg+3SgO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVoka   		ENCLITICS ; ! repeat line
@R.person.OT@+5Sg/Pl+4SgO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVokini   	ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Plural Subject, Singular Object, INDEPENDENT
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+1SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokihpoaawa  		ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NI@+3Pl+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVoki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+3Pl+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVoki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+4Pl+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVoki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+4Pl+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVoki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+4Pl+3SgO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVoka   		ENCLITICS ;
!@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+5Sg/PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>yiiyi   		ENCLITICS ; ! repeat line

! Inverse, Plural Subject and Object, INDEPENDENT
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+1PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokihpinnaana  ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokiyi	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+3Pl+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnaani  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+3Pl+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoaayi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+4Pl+3PlO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVokoaayi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+4Pl+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoaayi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokiyi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+4Pl+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnaani  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+5Sg/Pl+4PlO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVokoaayini  ENCLITICS ;

! Inverse, Plural Object, Singular Subject, INDEPENDENT
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+1PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokihpinnaana  ANIM_INTERR ; 
@R.person.KI@+3Sg+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoaawa   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnaana 		ENCLITICS ;	
!@R.person.NI@+3Sg+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnaan 		ENCLITICS ;	KS removed re discussion with IG, suffix is meaningful
@R.person.OT@+4Sg+3PlO:@R.person.OT@%>%^INVokoaayi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+4Sg+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoaayini   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVokiyini   	ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NI@+4Sg+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokinnaanini   	ANIM_INTERR ;

! Unspecified INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+Unspec+1SgO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVokoo   	ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NI@+Unspec+1PlO:@R.person.NI@%>%^INVotsspinnaana   	ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.KI@+Unspec+2SgO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVokoo   	ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.KI@+Unspec+2PlO:@R.person.KI@%>%^INVotsspoaawa   	ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+21PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^INVotssp  	ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+3SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVawa   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+3PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVayi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+4SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVayini   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+Unspec+4PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>%^VLVayi   	ENCLITICS ;
